tests/infixes10.aff
# infixes (see manual)
# example of arabic UTF-8 prefix
SET UTF-8
#قل => قول، يقول باستعمال اللاحقة
SFX A Y 2
SFX A 0 و. .
SFX A 0 و.ي .

#ql => qol, yqol by suffix
SFX a Y 2
SFX a 0 o. .
SFX a 0 o.y .
